Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1584.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 14.1(d)(1)(v) of the act of June 30, 1981 (P.L.128, No.43), known as the Agricultural Area Security Law, is amended and subsection (i) is amended by adding paragraphs to read:Section 14.1. Purchase of agricultural conservation easements.* * *(d) Program approval.--(1) The standards, criteria and requirements established by the State board for State board approval of county programs for purchasing agricultural conservation easements shall include, but not be limited to, the extent to which the county programs consider and address the following:123456789101112131415161718 * * *(v) (I) Provisions requiring a farmland tract to be contiguous acreage of at least 50 acres in size unless the tract is at least ten acres in size and is [either] utilized for a crop unique to the area [or is], or is less than ten acres in size and is contiguous to property which has a perpetual conservation easement in place held by a "qualified organization" as defined in section 170(h)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 (Public Law 99-514, 26 U.S.C. § 170(h)(3)).(II) A county may require a farmland tract to be contiguous acreage of at least 35 acres in size unless the tract is at least ten acres in size and is [either] utilized for a crop unique to the area [or is], or is less than ten acres in size and is contiguous to a property which has a perpetual conservation easement in place held by a "qualified conservation organization" as defined in section 170(h)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986. If a county implements the provisions of this subclause, State funds used for the purchase of an agricultural conservation easement less than 50 acres in size may include costs incidental to the purchase and shall not exceed 50% of the purchase price per acre, unless it is at least ten acres in size and is [either] utilized for a crop unique to the area [or is], or is less than ten acres in size and is contiguous to a property which has a perpetual conservation easement in place held by a "qualified conservation 20250HB1584PN1893 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 organization" as defined in section 170(h)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986. A county program shall require a minimum weighted value of 20% for prioritizing applications for agricultural conservation easement purchase when implementing the provisions of paragraph (ii.1).(III) A farmland tract that is less than ten acres in size may be considered for agricultural conservation easement purchase only if the tract is added to a contiguous tract of land subject to an agricultural conservation easement under this act. A deed of merger shall be prepared and recorded with the recorder of deeds to add the tract to the deed of easement of the contiguous tract.* * *(i) Subdivision of land after easement purchase.--* * *(3) Notwithstanding the provisions of paragraph (1), a county program shall provide for land subject to an agricultural conservation easement to be subdivided under all of the following conditions:(i) The tract to be created by subdivision is less than ten acres.(ii) The tract created under subparagraph (i) is contiguous to land subject to an agricultural conservation easement under this act.(iii) The tract created under subparagraph (i) is conveyed or transferred to the owner of that contiguous tract of land . (iv) The tract created under subparagraph (i) is 20250HB1584PN1893 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 merged into the contiguous tract and deeds of merger are prepared and recorded with the recorder of deeds to add the tract:(A) as a fee simple interest to the contiguous parcel of the new owner; and(B) to the deed of easement of the new owner.(v) A tract from which a tract is subdivided under subparagraph (i) shall continue to meet the provisions of paragraph (1) and subsection (d)(1)(v).(4) A subdivision under paragraph (3) shall not be subject to roll-back taxes under the "Pennsylvania Farmland and Forest Land Assessment Act of 1974."(5) A tract created under paragraph (3)(i) may not be used for the purpose of a residence under paragraph (1)(ii).* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 30 days.20250HB1584PN1893 - 4 - 12345678910111213141516